North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 9. Condemnation.

§ 136-103.
Institution of action and deposit.

In case condemnation shall become necessary the Department of Transportation shall institute a civil action by filing in the superior court of any county in which the land is located a complaint and a declaration of taking declaring that such land, easement, or interest therein is thereby taken for the use of the Department of Transportation.

Said declaration shall contain or have attached thereto the following:

A statement of the authority under which and the public use for which said land is taken.

A description of the entire tract or tracts affected by said taking sufficient for the identification thereof.

A statement of the estate or interest in said land taken for public use and a description of the area taken sufficient for the identification thereof.

The names and addresses of those persons who the Department of Transportation is informed and believes may have or claim to have an interest in said lands, so far as the same can by reasonable diligence be ascertained and if any such persons are infants, non compos mentis, under any other disability, or their whereabouts or names unknown, it must be so stated.

A statement of the sum of money estimated by said Department of Transportation to be just compensation for said taking.

Said complaint shall contain or have attached thereto the following:

A statement of the authority under which and the public use for which said land is taken.

A description of the entire tract or tracts affected by said taking sufficient for the identification thereof.

A statement of the estate or interest in said land taken for public use and a description of the area taken sufficient for the identification thereof.

The names and addresses of those persons who the Department of Transportation is informed and believes may have or claim to have an interest in said lands, so far as the same can by reasonable diligence be ascertained and if any such persons are infants, non compos mentis, under any other disability, or their whereabouts or names unknown, it must be so stated.

A statement as to such liens or other encumbrances as the Department of Transportation is informed and believes are encumbrances upon said real estate and can by reasonable diligence be ascertained.

A prayer that there be a determination of just compensation in accordance with the provisions of this Article.

The filing of said complaint and said declaration of taking shall be accompanied by the deposit of the sum of money estimated by said Department of Transportation to be just compensation for said taking and upon the filing of said complaint and said declaration of taking and deposit of said sum, summons shall be issued and together with a copy of said complaint and said declaration of taking and notice of the deposit be served upon the person named therein in the manner now provided for the service of process in civil actions. The Department of Transportation may amend the complaint and declaration of taking and may increase the amount of its deposit with the court at any time while the proceeding is pending, and the owner shall have the same rights of withdrawal of this additional amount as set forth in

G.S. 136-105

of this Chapter.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 1; 1963, c. 1156, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1997-456, s. 27.

Local Modification.

(As to Article 9) village of Grandfather: 1987, c. 419, s. 1; village of Pinehurst: 1985, c. 379, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A.

As to proration of the property tax liability of the owner of land taken by condemnation, see

G.S. 40A-6

.

§ 136-103.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 29.8(c), effective July 1, 2015.

History.

1973, c. 507, s. 4; 2009-266, s. 26; 2014-100, s. 34.24(d); repealed by 2015-241, s. 29.8(c), effective July 1, 2015.

Cross References.

For present provisions pertaining to engagement of outside counsel by the Department of Transportation, see

G.S. 136-18.03

.

§ 136-104.
Vesting of title and right of possession; recording memorandum or supplemental memorandum of action.

Upon the filing of the complaint and the declaration of taking and deposit in court, to the use of the person entitled thereto, of the amount of the estimated compensation stated in the declaration, title to said land or such other interest therein specified in the complaint and the declaration of taking, together with the right to immediate possession hereof shall vest in the Department of Transportation and the judge shall enter such orders in the cause as may be required to place the Department of Transportation in possession, and said land shall be deemed to be condemned and taken for the use of the Department of Transportation and the right to just compensation therefor shall vest in the person owning said property or any compensable interest therein at the time of the filing of the complaint and the declaration of taking and deposit of the money in court, and compensation shall be determined and awarded in said action and established by judgment therein.

Where there is a life estate and a remainder either vested or contingent, in lieu of the investment of the proceeds of the amount determined and awarded as just compensation to which the life tenant would be entitled to the use during the life estate, the court may in its discretion order the value of said life tenant’s share during the probable life of such life tenant be ascertained as now provided by law and paid directly to the life tenant out of the final award as just compensation established by the judgment in the cause and the life tenant may have the relief provided for in

G.S. 136-105

.

On and after July 1, 1961, the Department of Transportation, at the time of the filing of the complaint and declaration of taking and deposit of estimated compensation, shall record a memorandum of action with the register of deeds in all counties in which the land involved therein is located and said memorandum shall be recorded among the land records of said county. Upon the amending of any complaint and declaration of taking affecting the property taken, the Department of Transportation shall record a supplemental memorandum of action. The memorandum of action shall contain

The names of those persons who the Department of Transportation is informed and believes may have or claim to have an interest in said lands and who are parties to said action;

A description of the entire tract or tracts affected by said taking sufficient for the identification thereof;

A statement of the estate or interest in said land taken for public use;

The date of institution of said action, the county in which said action is pending, and such other reference thereto as may be necessary for the identification of said action.

As to those actions instituted by the Department of Transportation under the provisions of this Article prior to July 1, 1961, the Department of Transportation shall, on or before October 1, 1961, record a memorandum of action with the register of deeds in all counties in which said land is located as hereinabove set forth; however, the failure of the Department of Transportation to record said memorandum shall not invalidate those actions instituted prior to July 1, 1961.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 2; 1963, c. 1156, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 522, s. 1; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

Cross References.

As to right of condemnor to take voluntary nonsuit, see

G.S. 1-209.2

.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing constitutional challenges to “quick take” condemnation proceedings, see 8 N.C. Cent. L.J. 289 (1977).

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

§ 136-105.
Disbursement of deposit; serving copy of disbursing order on Department of Transportation.

The person named in the complaint and declaration of taking may apply to the court for disbursement of the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, as full compensation, or as a credit against just compensation without prejudice to further proceedings in the cause to determine just compensation. Upon such application, the judge shall, unless there is a dispute as to title, order that the money deposited be paid forthwith to the person entitled thereto in accordance with the application. The judge shall have power to make such orders with respect to encumbrances, liens, rents, taxes, assessments, insurance, and other charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.

No notice to the Department of Transportation of the hearing upon the application for disbursement of deposit shall be necessary, but a copy of the order disbursing the deposit shall be served upon the Secretary of Transportation, or such other process agents as may be designated by the Department of Transportation.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 3; 1965, c. 55, s. 14; 1969, c. 649; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 26.

§ 136-106.
Answer, reply and plat.

Any person whose property has been taken by the Department of Transportation by the filing of a complaint and a declaration of taking, may within the time hereinafter set forth file an answer to the complaint only praying for a determination of just compensation. No answer shall be filed to the declaration of taking and notice of deposit. Said answer shall, in addition, contain the following:

Such admissions or denials of the allegations of the complaint as are appropriate.

The names and addresses of the persons filing said answer, together with a statement as to their interest in the property taken.

Such affirmative defenses or matters as are pertinent to the action.

A copy of the answer shall be served on the Department of Transportation, or such other process agents as may be designated by the Department of Transportation, in Raleigh, provided that failure to serve the answer shall not deprive the answer of its validity. The affirmative allegations of said answer shall be deemed denied. The Department of Transportation may, however, file a reply within 30 days from receipt of a copy of the answer.

The Department of Transportation, within 90 days from the receipt of the answer shall file in the cause a plat of the land taken and such additional area as may be necessary to properly determine the damages, and a copy thereof shall be mailed to the parties or their attorney; provided, however, the Department of Transportation shall not be required to file a map or plat in less than six months from the date of the filing of the complaint.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 4; 1963, c. 1156, ss. 3, 4; 1965, c. 55, s. 15; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 28.

§ 136-107.
Time for filing answer.

Any person named in and served with a complaint and declaration of taking shall have 12 months from the date of service thereof to file answer. Failure to answer within said time shall constitute an admission that the amount deposited is just compensation and shall be a waiver of any further proceeding to determine just compensation; in such event the judge shall enter final judgment in the amount deposited and order disbursement of the money deposited to the owner. Provided, however, at any time prior to the entry of the final judgment the judge may, for good cause shown and after notice to the plaintiff, extend the time for filing answer for 30 days. Provided that when the procedures of Article 9 of Chapter 136 are employed by the Department of Administration, any person named in or served with a complaint and declaration of taking shall have 120 days from the date of service thereof within which to file an answer.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 625; 1981, c. 245, s. 2.

§ 136-108.
Determination of issues other than damages.

After the filing of the plat, the judge, upon motion and 10 days’ notice by either the Department of Transportation or the owner, shall, either in or out of term, hear and determine any and all issues raised by the pleadings other than the issue of damages, including, but not limited to, if controverted, questions of necessary and proper parties, title to the land, interest taken, and area taken.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1963, c. 1156, s. 5; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For note discussing constitutional challenges to “quick take” condemnation proceedings, see 8 N.C. Cent. L.J. 289 (1977).

§ 136-109.
Appointment of commissioners.

Upon request of the owner in the answer, or upon motion filed by either the Department of Transportation or the owner within 60 days after the filing of answer, the clerk shall appoint, after the determination of other issues as provided by

G.S. 136-108

of this Chapter, three competent, disinterested freeholders residing in the county to go upon the property and under oath appraise the damage to the land sustained by reason of the taking and report same to the court within a time certain. If no request or motion is made for the appointment of commissioners within the time permitted, the cause shall be transferred to the civil issue docket for trial as to the issue of just compensation.

Such commissioners, if appointed, shall have the power to make such inspection of the property, hold such hearings, swear such witnesses, and take such evidence as they may, in their discretion, deem necessary, and shall file into court a report of their determination of the damages sustained.

Said report of commissioners shall in substance be in written form as follows:

Click to view

A copy of the report shall at the time of filing be mailed to each of the parties. Within 30 days after the filing of the report, either the Department of Transportation or the owner, may except thereto and demand a trial de novo by a jury as to the issue of damages. Whereupon the action shall be placed on the civil issue docket of the superior court for trial de novo by a jury as to the issue of damages, provided, that upon agreement of both parties trial by jury may be waived and the issue determined by the judge. The report of commissioners shall not be competent as evidence upon the trial of the issue of damages in the superior court, nor shall evidence of the deposit by the Department of Transportation into the court be competent upon the trial of the issue of damages. If no exception to the report of commissioners is filed within the time prescribed final judgment shall be entered by the judge upon a determination and finding by him that the report of commissioners, plus interest computed in accordance with

G.S. 136-113

of this Chapter, awards to the property owners just compensation. In the event that the judge is of the opinion and, in his discretion, determines that such award does not provide just compensation he shall set aside said award and order the case placed on the civil issue docket for determination of the issue of damages by a jury.

TO THE SUPERIOR COURT OF COUNTY We, , and Commissioners appointed by the Court to assess the damages that have been and will be sustained by , the owner of certain land lying in County, North Carolina, which has been taken by the Department of Transportation for highway purposes, do hereby certify that we convened, and, having first been duly sworn, visited the premises, and took such evidence as was presented to us, and after taking into full consideration the quality and quantity of the land and all other facts which reasonably affect its fair market value at the time of the taking, we have determined the fair market value of the part of the land taken to be the sum of $ and the damage to the remainder of the land of the owner by reason of the taking to be the sum of $ (if applicable). We have determined the general and special benefits resulting to said owner from the construction of the highway to be the sum of $ (if applicable). GIVEN under our hands, this the day of ,
(SEAL)
(SEAL)
(SEAL)

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 5; 1963, c. 1156, s. 6; 1973, c. 108, s. 85; c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1; 1999-456, s. 59.

§ 136-110.
Parties; orders; continuances.

The judge may appoint some competent attorney to appear for and protect the rights of any party or parties in interest who are unknown, or whose residence is unknown and who has not appeared in the proceeding by an attorney or agent. The judge shall appoint guardians ad litem for such parties as are minors, incompetents, or other parties who may be under a disability and without general guardian, and the judge shall have the authority to make such additional parties as are necessary to the complete determination of the proceeding and enter such other orders either in law or equity as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this Article.

Upon the coming on of the cause for hearing pursuant to

G.S. 136-108

or upon the coming on of the cause for trial, the judge, in order that the material ends of justice may be served, upon his own motion, or upon motion of any of the parties thereto and upon proper showing that the effect of condemnation upon the subject property cannot presently be determined, may, in his discretion, continue the cause until the highway project under which the appropriation occurred is open to traffic, or until such earlier time as, in the opinion of the judge, the effect of condemnation upon said property may be determined.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1963, c. 1156, s. 7.

§ 136-111.
Remedy where no declaration of taking filed; recording memorandum of action.

Any person whose land or compensable interest therein has been taken by an intentional or unintentional act or omission of the Department of Transportation and no complaint and declaration of taking has been filed by said Department of Transportation may, within 24 months of the date of the taking of the affected property or interest therein or the completion of the project involving the taking, whichever shall occur later, file a complaint in the superior court setting forth the names and places of residence of the parties, so far as the same can by reasonable diligence be ascertained, who own or have, or claim to own or have estates or interests in the said real estate and if any such persons are under a legal disability, it must be so stated, together with a statement as to any encumbrances on said real estate; said complaint shall further allege with particularity the facts which constitute said taking together with the dates that they allegedly occurred; said complaint shall describe the property allegedly owned by said parties and shall describe the area and interests allegedly taken. Upon the filing of said complaint summons shall issue and together with a copy of said complaint be served on the Department of Transportation as provided by

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4(j)(4). The allegations of said complaint shall be deemed denied; however, the Department of Transportation within 60 days of service of summons and complaint may file answer thereto, and if said taking is admitted by the Department of Transportation, it shall, at the time of filing answer, deposit with the court the estimated amount of compensation for said taking and notice of said deposit shall be given to said owner. Said owner may apply for disbursement of said deposit and disbursement shall be made in accordance with the applicable provisions of

G.S. 136-105

of this Chapter. If a taking is admitted, the Department of Transportation shall, within 90 days of the filing of the answer to the complaint, file a map or plat of the land taken. The procedure hereinbefore set out shall be followed for the purpose of determining all matters raised by the pleadings and the determination of just compensation.

The plaintiff at the time of filing of the complaint shall record a memorandum of action with the register of deeds in all counties in which the land involved therein is located, said memorandum to be recorded among the land records of said county. The memorandum of action shall contain

The names of those persons who the plaintiff is informed and believes may have or claim to have an interest in said lands and who are parties to said action;

A description of the entire tract or tracts affected by the alleged taking sufficient for the identification thereof;

A statement of the estate or interest in said land allegedly taken for public use; and

The date on which plaintiff alleges the taking occurred, the date on which said action was instituted, the county in which it was instituted, and such other reference thereto as may be necessary for the identification of said action.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 6; 1963, c. 1156, s. 8; 1965, c. 514, ss. 1, 11/2; 1971, c. 1195; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, ss. 7.1, 29; 1985, c. 182.

§ 136-112.
Measure of damages.

The following shall be the measure of damages to be followed by the commissioners, jury or judge who determines the issue of damages:

Where only a part of a tract is taken, the measure of damages for said taking shall be the difference between the fair market value of the entire tract immediately prior to said taking and the fair market value of the remainder immediately after said taking, with consideration being given to any special or general benefits resulting from the utilization of the part taken for highway purposes.

Where the entire tract is taken the measure of damages for said taking shall be the fair market value of the property at the time of taking.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2.

Cross References.

For highway cases discussing offsets against damages prior to the enactment of this section, see case notes under

G.S. 136-19

.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 property law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1509 (1980).

§ 136-113.
Interest as a part of just compensation.

To said amount awarded as damages by the commissioners or a jury or judge, the judge shall, as a part of just compensation, add interest at the legal rate on said amount from the date of taking to the date of satisfaction of the judgment; but interest shall not be allowed from the date of deposit on so much thereof as shall have been paid into court as provided in this Article. For purposes of this section, the term “legal rate” means the prime lending rate, as published by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System on the first business day of the calendar month immediately preceding the date of taking. The legal rate established under this section shall not exceed the legal rate set in

G.S. 24-1

. An amount awarded as damages shall bear simple, not compounding, interest.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1983, c. 812; 2016-90, s. 18(b); 2019-251, s. 1.4(b).

§ 136-114.
Additional rules.

In all cases of procedure under this Article where the mode or manner of conducting the action is not expressly provided for in this Article or by the statute governing civil procedure or where said civil procedure statutes are inapplicable the judge before whom such proceeding may be pending shall have the power to make all the necessary orders and rules of procedure necessary to carry into effect the object and intent of this Chapter and the practice in such cases shall conform as near as may be to the practice in other civil actions in said courts.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2.

§ 136-115.
Definitions.

For the purpose of this Article

The word “judge” shall mean the resident judge of the superior court in the district where the cause is pending, or special judge residing in said district, or the judge of the superior court assigned to hold the courts of said district or the emergency or special judge holding court in the county where the cause is pending.

The words “person,” “owner,” and “party” shall include the plural; the word “person” shall include a firm or public or private corporation, and the word “Department” shall mean the Department of Transportation.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 7; 1965, c. 422; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1975, c. 19, s. 47; 1977, c. 464, s. 30.

§ 136-116.
Final judgments.

Final judgments entered in actions instituted under the provisions of this Article shall contain a description of the property affected, together with a description of the property and estate of interest acquired by the Department of Transportation and a copy of said judgment shall be certified to the register of deeds in the county in which the land or any part thereof lies and be recorded among the land records of said county.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-117.
Payment of compensation.

If there are adverse and conflicting claimants to the deposit made into the court by the Department of Transportation or the additional amount determined as just compensation, on which final judgment is entered in said action, the judge may direct the full amount determined to be paid into said court by the Department of Transportation and may retain said cause for determination of who is entitled to said moneys and may by further order in the cause direct to whom the same shall be paid and may in its discretion order a reference to ascertain the facts on which such determination and order are to be made.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-118.
Agreements for entry.

The provisions of this Article shall not prevent the Department of Transportation and the owner from entering into a written agreement whereby the owner agrees and consents that the Department of Transportation may enter upon his property without filing the complaint and declaration of taking and depositing estimated compensation as herein provided and the Department of Transportation shall have the same rights under such agreement with the owner in carrying on work on such project as it would have by having filed a complaint and a declaration of taking and having deposited estimated compensation as provided in this Article.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1961, c. 1084, s. 8; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-119.
Costs and appeal.

The Department of Transportation shall pay all court costs taxed by the court. Either party shall have a right of appeal to the Supreme Court for errors of law committed in any proceedings provided for in this Article in the same manner as in any other civil actions and it shall not be necessary that an appeal bond be posted.

The court having jurisdiction of the condemnation action instituted by the Department of Transportation to acquire real property by condemnation shall award the owner of any right, or title to, or interest in, such real property such sum as will in the opinion of the court reimburse such owner for his reasonable cost, disbursements, and expenses, including reasonable attorney fees, appraisal, and engineering fees, actually incurred because of the condemnation proceedings, if (i) the final judgment is that the Department of Transportation cannot acquire real property by condemnation; or (ii) the proceeding is abandoned by the Department of Transportation.

The judge rendering a judgment for the plaintiff in a proceeding brought under

G.S. 136-111

awarding compensation for the taking of property, shall determine and award or allow to such plaintiff, as a part of such judgment, such sum as will in the opinion of the judge reimburse such plaintiff for his reasonable cost, disbursements and expenses, including reasonable attorney, appraisal, and engineering fees, actually incurred because of such proceeding.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1971, c. 1102, s. 1; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-120.
Entry for surveys.

The Department of Transportation without having filed a complaint and a declaration of taking as provided in this Article is authorized to enter upon any lands and structures upon lands to make surveys, borings, soundings or examinations as may be necessary in carrying out and performing its duties under this Chapter, and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass, or taking within the meaning of this Article; provided, however, that the Department of Transportation shall make reimbursement for any damage resulting to such land as a result of such activities and the owner, if necessary, shall be entitled to proceed under the provisions of

G.S. 136-111

of this Chapter to recover for such damage.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-121.
Refund of deposit.

In the event the amount of the final judgment is less than the amount deposited by the Department of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of this Article, the Department of Transportation shall be entitled to recover the excess of the amount of the deposit over the amount of the final judgment and court costs incident thereto: Provided, however, in the event there are not sufficient funds on deposit to cover said excess the Department of Transportation shall be entitled to a judgment for said sum against the person or persons having received said deposit.

History.

1959, c. 1025, s. 2; 1973, c. 507, s. 5; 1977, c. 464, s. 7.1.

§ 136-121.1.
Reimbursement of owner for taxes paid on condemned property.

A property owner whose property is totally taken in fee simple by any condemning agency (as defined in G.S. 133-7(1)) exercising the power of eminent domain, under this Chapter or any other statute or charter provision, shall be entitled to reimbursement from the condemning agency of the pro rata portion of real property taxes paid that are allocable to a period subsequent to vesting of title in the agency, or the effective date of possession of the real property, whichever is earlier.

An owner who meets the following conditions is entitled to reimbursement from the condemning agency for all deferred taxes paid by the owner pursuant to G.S. 105-277.4(c) as a result of the condemnation:

The owner is a natural person whose property is taken in fee simple by a condemning agency exercising the power of eminent domain under this Chapter or any other statute.

The owner also owns agricultural land, horticultural land, or forestland that is contiguous to the condemned property and that is in active production.

A potential condemning agency that seeks to acquire property by gift or purchase shall give the owner written notice of the provisions of this section. The definitions in

G.S. 105-277.2

apply in this subsection.

History.

1975, c. 439, s. 1; 1997-270, s. 2.